Washington statutes.
RCW 35.34.020

Application of chapter.

This chapter applies to all cities of the first and second classes and to all towns, that have by ordinance adopted this chapter authorizing the adoption of a fiscal biennium budget.

[ 1997 c 361 s 15; 1985 c 175 s 5.]